Hawaii, session 2026, GM1323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that The Joint Commissio-n
is the most widely used accreditation organization for hospitals
in the United States. The legislature further finds that other
accreditation organizations have also been approved by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and also provide
accreditation to hospitals. These organizations include the
Accreditation Commission for Health Care, Center for Improvement
in Healthcare Quality, and DNV Healthcare. Currently, The Joint
Commission is the only accreditation organization authorized in
the State to provide accreditation that demonstrates a
hospital's compliance with all licensing inspections required by
the State.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the
department of health to adopt rules to allow hospitals to
demonstrate compliance with all licensing inspections required
by the State through accreditation or certification by any
2026-2392 SB2271 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiniHiMininiiiiiiii

Page 2 S.B. NO. 2271
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
accreditation or certification organization approved by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
SECTION 2. Section 321-14.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (c) to (e) to read as follows:
"(c) The rules [may] shall provide that accreditation or
certification by [Tho--Joint Commisoion] an accreditation
organization or certification organization approved by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services demonstrates a
hospital's compliance with all licensing inspections required by
the State. The rules may exempt a hospital from a licensing
inspection on a continuing basis throughout the term of the
accreditation or certification under the following conditions:
(1) The hospital provides the department with a certified
copy of the hospital's official accreditation or
certification report [from The Joint Commiogion];
(2) The hospital continuously holds full accreditation [fey
The- Joint Commi-eoiofi; ] or certification and provides
the department with a certified copy of the hospital's
official accreditation or certification report; and
(3) The hospital holds a current and valid state license.
2026-2392 SB2271 GDI SMA.docx
iHiiiiHiniiniiiiiiiiNiiii

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(d) The rules shall provide that the department may
conduct inspections and investigations of exempt hospitals [-fee
invootigato] regarding complaints, [follow- up-on] adverse
accreditation or certification findings, or [eoftdaet-] periodic
validation surveys.
(e) Information contained in reports of survey and
official accreditation or certification letters made by [T^he
Joint Comminoion] an accreditation organization or a
certification organization approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services that are used in determining compliance
with licensing requirements shall be public information."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2392 SB2271 CDl SMA.docx
liiMiniHHiiiiiNinin

2271
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2271, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
221-26

SB No. 2271, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives